Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Chapter 3.6. Potomac River Riparian Rights Act.

§ 62.1-44.113.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Potomac River Riparian Rights Act.”

History.

1979, c. 307.

§ 62.1-44.114.
Use of Potomac River; riparian rights.

The Commonwealth and its citizens shall have the right to such use of the Potomac River as may be necessary to the full enjoyment of their riparian ownership as provided at common law and in the Compact of 1785 with Maryland, and confirmed by the Black-Jenkins Determination of 1877 and Article VII, § 1 of §

28.2-1001

, cited as the Potomac River Compact of 1958.

History.

1979, c. 307; 2005, c. 839.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, a statutory reference was updated to conform to a 1992 act.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 839, effective October 1, 2005, deleted “§ 7.1-7 of” preceding “the Compact.”

§ 62.1-44.115.
Review of uses by Water Control Board; report.

The State Water Control Board shall annually review the uses and development of the waters of the Potomac River, and make such report thereon as it deems advisable to the Governor and to the General Assembly, together with such recommendations as the Board feels are necessary for the protection and full enjoyment of Virginia’s riparian rights in such river.

History.

1979, c. 307.

§ 62.1-44.116.
Assistance by Board in riparian disputes.

In the event non-Virginia claimants question or seek to abridge the riparian use of the waters of the Potomac River by Virginia riparian owners, the State Water Control Board shall advise and assist such riparian owners in the proper exercise and protection of their rights, giving due consideration to the rights of others and to the wise use of the water, and the Board shall assist in the resolution of conflicts concerning such rights.

History.

1979, c. 307.